Hawaii statutes.
[§425-171] Action by director. The
director may maintain an action to restrain a foreign limited liability
partnership from transacting business in this State in violation of this
subpart. [L 2000, c 218, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next